Ohio, session 136, HB856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3902.65 and 5164.11 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3902.65. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Licensed mental health professional" includes all of the following: (a) A clinical nurse specialist or certified nurse practitioner, each as defined under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code, who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, family medicine, or pediatrics; (b) A physician assistant licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, family medicine, or pediatrics; (c) A physician who is a primary care physician or who specializes in the practice of psychiatry, family medicine, or pediatrics; (d) A psychologist licensed under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code; (e) A professional counselor, professional clinical counselor, social worker, independent social worker, marriage and family therapist, or independent marriage and family therapist licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code; (f) A chemical dependency counselor licensed under Chapter 4758. of the Revised Code. (2) "Mental health well check" means an annual visit that includes a review of medical history, evaluation of risk and protective factors, use of a developmentally appropriate and validated mental health screening tool, education and consultation on healthy lifestyle changes, referral to ongoing mental health services, and other supports as needed. (3) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (B)(1) Notwithstanding section 3901.71 of the Revised Code, a health benefit plan shall cover an annual mental health well check performed by a licensed mental health professional for each child and adult enrolled in the plan to the same extent that the plan covers an annual physical health well check. (C) The superintendent of insurance shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. Sec. 5164.11. (A) As used in this section, "licensed mental health professional" and "mental health well check" have the same meanings as in section 3902.65 of the Revised Code. (B) The medicaid program shall cover an annual mental health well check performed by a licensed mental health professional for each medicaid recipient to the same extent that a physical health well check is covered. (C) The medicaid director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. Section 2. The enactment of section 3902.65 of the Revised Code by this act applies to health benefit plans, as defined in section 3922.01 of the Revised Code, that are delivered, issued for delivery, modified, or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.